New York, session 2025-2026, A628.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The penal law is amended by adding a new article 223 to 2 read as follows: 3 ARTICLE 223 4 NATURAL PLANT OR FUNGUS-BASED HALLUCINOGENS 5 Section 223.00 Definitions. 6 223.05 Authorized use of natural plant or fungus-based halluci- 7 nogens. 8 223.10 Protections. 9 223.15 Local authorization. 10 § 223.00 Definitions. 11 For the purposes of this article, the following terms shall have the 12 following meanings: 13 1. "Natural plant or fungus-based hallucinogen" means a plant, fungus, 14 material, compound, mixture, or preparation, which contains any quantity 15 of any of the following substances, or which contains any of the follow- 16 ing substances salts, isomers, or salts of isomers whenever the exist- 17 ence of such salts, isomers, or salts of isomers is possible within the 18 specific chemical designation (for purposes of this subdivision only, 19 the term "isomer" includes the optical, position and geometric isomers): 20 (a) Dimethyltryptamine (some trade or other names: DMT); EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02046-01-5 A. 628 2 1 (b) Ibogaine (some trade and other names: 7-ethyl-6, 6&, 7, 8, 9, 10, 2 12, 13-octahydro-2-methoxy-6, 9-methano-5h-pyrido {1',2':1,2} azepino 3 {5,4-b} indole: tabernanthe iboga); 4 (c) Mescaline; 5 (d) Psilocybin; or 6 (e) Psilocyn. 7 2. "Paraphernalia" means any of the following objects used for the 8 following purposes: 9 (a) Kits, used or designed for the purpose of planting, propagating, 10 cultivating, growing or harvesting of any species of plant or fungus 11 which is a natural plant or fungus-based hallucinogen or from which a 12 natural plant or fungus-based hallucinogen can be derived; 13 (b) Kits, used or designed for the purpose of manufacturing, compound- 14 ing, converting, producing, or preparing natural plant or fungus-based 15 hallucinogens; 16 (c) Isomerization devices, used or designed for the purpose of 17 increasing the potency of any species of plant or fungus which is a 18 natural plant or fungus-based hallucinogen; 19 (d) Scales and balances, used or designed for the purpose of weighing 20 or measuring natural plant or fungus-based hallucinogens; 21 (e) Diluents and adulterants, including but not limited to quinine 22 hydrochloride, mannitol, mannite, dextrose and lactose, used or designed 23 for the purpose of cutting natural plant or fungus-based hallucinogens; 24 and/or 25 (f) Objects, used or designed for the purpose of ingesting, inhaling, 26 or otherwise introducing natural plant or fungus-based hallucinogens 27 into the human body. 28 § 223.05 Authorized use of natural plant or fungus-based hallucinogens. 29 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, rule or regulation to 30 the contrary, the following conduct shall not be prohibited under this 31 chapter, the laws of this state, or the laws of any locality or munici- 32 pality within this state: 33 (a) The possession, use, cultivation, production, creation, analysis, 34 gifting, exchange, or sharing by or between natural persons of twenty- 35 one years of age or older of a natural plant or fungus-based hallucino- 36 gen; 37 (b) The provision of supervision, guidance, peers engaging in risk 38 mitigation, religious, spiritual, or related supportive services with or 39 without remuneration, by natural persons of twenty-one years of age or 40 older to natural persons of twenty-one years of age or older who are 41 engaging in the intentional and consenting use of natural plant or 42 fungus-based hallucinogens; 43 (c) The manufacture, possession, and/or distribution of paraphernalia, 44 designed for use in the cultivation, production, storage, or use of 45 natural plant or fungus-based hallucinogens by a natural person of twen- 46 ty-one years of age or older; or 47 (d) The possession, use, cultivation, production, creation, analysis, 48 administration, gifting, exchange and/or sharing of natural plant or 49 fungus-based hallucinogens to natural persons of twenty-one years of age 50 or older by a religious organization for religious and ceremonial use or 51 other non-commercial organizations. 52 2. The manufacture, possession, and/or distribution of paraphernalia 53 shall be authorized within the meaning of 21 USC 863(f). 54 3. Natural plant or fungus-based hallucinogens or paraphernalia 55 involved in any way with conduct deemed lawful by this section shall not 56 be contraband nor subject to seizure or forfeiture of assets under arti- A. 628 3 1 cle four hundred eighty of this chapter, section thirteen hundred eleven 2 of the civil practice law and rules, or other applicable law, and no 3 conduct deemed lawful by this section shall constitute an element of a 4 state or local crime or offense or be the basis for search, investi- 5 gation, detention, arrest or other legal penalty or sanction. 6 4. A person under parole, probation or other state or local super- 7 vision, or released on bail awaiting trial as of the effective date of 8 this section shall not be punished or otherwise penalized for conduct 9 that is no longer considered criminal under this section. 10 5. State or local law enforcement agencies shall not cooperate with or 11 provide assistance to the government of the United States or any agency 12 thereof in enforcing the federal controlled substances act solely for 13 actions permitted under this section, except as pursuant to a valid 14 court order. 15 § 223.10 Protections. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary: 17 1. An otherwise enforceable contract shall not be unenforceable on the 18 basis that natural plant or fungus-based hallucinogens, as allowed under 19 this article, are prohibited by federal law. 20 2. A holder of a professional or occupational license, certification, 21 or registration shall not be subject to professional discipline or loss 22 of a professional license or certification for personal use of natural 23 plant or fungus-based hallucinogens authorized under this article. This 24 subdivision shall not permit a person to engage in malpractice. 25 3. Mental health, substance use disorder, or behavioral health 26 services shall not be denied on the basis that they are covered in 27 conjunction with natural plant or fungus-based hallucinogen services or 28 that natural plant or fungus-based hallucinogens are prohibited by 29 federal law. No insurance or insurance provider shall be required to 30 cover the cost of natural plant or fungus-based hallucinogens. 31 4. Conduct permitted by this article shall not, by itself: 32 (a) constitute child abuse or neglect without a finding of actual 33 threat to the health or welfare of a child based on all relevant 34 factors; or 35 (b) be the basis to restrict parenting time with a child without a 36 finding that the parenting time would endanger such child's physical 37 health or significantly impair such child's emotional development. 38 5. For the purposes of medical care, including organ transplants, a 39 patient's use of natural plant or fungus-based hallucinogens authorized 40 under this article shall not constitute the use of an illicit substance 41 or otherwise disqualify an otherwise qualifying patient from medical 42 care or medical insurance. 43 6. Conduct permitted by this article shall not, by itself, be the 44 basis to deny eligibility for any public assistance program, unless 45 required by federal law. 46 7. An employer shall adhere to policies regarding natural plant or 47 fungus-based hallucinogen use in accordance with section two hundred 48 one-d of the labor law. 49 § 223.15 Local authorization. 50 A local municipality may adopt and implement legislation and policies 51 which bear directly on or are related to natural plant or fungus-based 52 hallucinogens in furtherance of this article. 53 § 2. Subdivisions 5, 9 and 10 of section 220.00 of the penal law, 54 subdivisions 5 and 9 as amended by chapter 92 of the laws of 2021 and 55 subdivision 10 as amended by chapter 664 of the laws of 1985, are 56 amended and a new subdivision 21 is added to read as follows: A. 628 4 1 5. "Controlled substance" means any substance listed in schedule I, 2 II, III, IV or V of section thirty-three hundred six of the public 3 health law. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, as used in 4 section 220.31 of this article, the term "controlled substance" shall 5 include natural plant or fungus-based hallucinogens; provided, however, 6 that the term "controlled substance" shall not include natural plant or 7 fungus-based hallucinogens as such term is used in any provision of law 8 other than section 220.31 of this article. 9 9. "Hallucinogen" means any controlled substance listed in paragraphs 10 (5), [(17)] (14), [(18), (19), (20)] (15) and [(21)] (16) of subdivision 11 (d) of schedule I of section thirty-three hundred six of the public 12 health law. "Hallucinogen" shall not include natural plant or fungus- 13 based hallucinogens. 14 10. "Hallucinogenic substance" means any controlled substance listed 15 in subdivision (d) of schedule [I(d)] I of section thirty-three hundred 16 six of the public health law other than concentrated cannabis, lysergic 17 acid diethylamide, or an hallucinogen. "Hallucinogenic substance" shall 18 not include natural plant or fungus-based hallucinogens. 19 21. "Natural plant or fungus-based hallucinogen" shall have the same 20 meaning as defined by section 223.00 of this title. 21 § 3. Subdivision (d) of schedule I of section 3306 of the public 22 health law, as added by chapter 664 of the laws of 1985, paragraphs 13, 23 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30 and 24 31 as amended by chapter 92 of the laws of 2021, paragraphs 33, 34 and 25 35 as added by chapter 370 of the laws of 2015, and paragraphs 36, 37 26 and 38 as added by section 5 of part BB of chapter 57 of the laws of 27 2018, is amended to read as follows: 28 (d) Hallucinogenic substances. Unless specifically excepted or unless 29 listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or prepara- 30 tion, which contains any quantity of the following hallucinogenic 31 substances, or which contains any of its salts, isomers, and salts of 32 isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of 33 isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation (for 34 purposes of this paragraph only, the term "isomer" includes the optical, 35 position and geometric isomers): 36 (EXPLANATION--Within the following chemical designations, character 37 symbol substitutions were made from the original text: "@" = Greek 38 alpha, "&" = Greek beta, "'" = prime mark and "/\" = triangle.) 39 (1) 4-bromo-2, 5-dimethoxy-amphetamine Some trade or other names: 40 4-bromo-2, 5-dimethoxy-@-methylphenethylamine; 4-bromo-2, 5-DMA. 41 (2) 2, 5-dimethoxyamphetamine Some trade or other names: 42 2, 5-dimethoxy-@-methylphenethylamine; 2, 5-DMA. 43 (3) 4-methoxyamphetamine Some trade or other names: 44 4-methoxy-@-methylphenethylamine; paramethoxyamphetamine, PMA. 45 (4) 5-methoxy-3, 4-methylenedioxy - amphetamine. 46 (5) 4-methyl-2, 5-dimethoxy-amphetamine Some trade and other names: 47 4-methyl-2, 5-dimethoxy-@-methylphenethylamine; "DOM"; and "STP". 48 (6) 3, 4-methylenedioxy amphetamine. 49 (7) 3, 4, 5-trimethoxy amphetamine. 50 (8) Bufotenine Some trade and other names: 3-(&-dimethylaminoethyl)-5 51 hydroxindole; 3-(2-dimethylaminoethyl)-5-indolol; 52 N, N-dimethylserotonin; -5-hydroxy-N, N-dimethyltryptamine; mappine. 53 (9) Diethyltryptamine Some trade and other names: 54 N, N-diethyltryptamine; DET. A. 628 5 1 (10) [Dimethyltryptamine Some trade or other names: DMT. 2 (11) Ibogane Some trade and other names: 7-ethyl-6, 6&, 7, 8, 9, 10, 3 12, 13-octahydro-2-methoxy-6, 9-methano-5h-pyrido {1',2':1,2} azepino 4 {5,4-b} indole: tabernanthe iboga. 5 (12)] Lysergic acid diethylamide. 6 [(13) Mescaline. 7 (14)] (11) Parahexyl. Some trade or other names: 8 3-Hexyl-1-hydroxy-7,8,9,10-tetra hydro-6,6,9-trimethyl-6H-dibenfo{b,d} 9 pyran. 10 [(15)] (12) Peyote. Meaning all parts of the plant presently classi- 11 fied botanically as Lophophora williamsii Lemaire, whether growing or 12 not, the seeds thereof, any extract from any part of such plant, and 13 every compound, manufacture, salts, derivative, mixture, or preparation 14 of such plant, its seeds or extracts. 15 [(16)] (13) N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate. 16 [(17)] (14) N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate. 17 [(18) Psilocybin. 18 (19) Psilocyn. 19 (20)] (15) Tetrahydrocannabinols. Synthetic tetrahydrocannabinols not 20 derived from the cannabis plant that are equivalents of the substances 21 contained in the plant, or in the resinous extractives of cannabis, sp. 22 and/or synthetic substances, derivatives, and their isomers with similar 23 chemical structure and pharmacological activity such as the following: 24 delta 1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers 25 delta 6 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers 26 delta 3, 4 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical isomers 27 (since nomenclature of these substances is not internationally standard- 28 ized, compounds of these structures, regardless of numerical designation 29 of atomic positions covered). Any Federal Food and Drug Administration 30 approved product containing tetrahydrocannabinol shall not be considered 31 a synthetic tetrahydrocannabinol. 32 [(21)] (16) Ethylamine analog of phencyclidine. Some trade or other 33 names: N-ethyl-1-phenylcyclohexylamine, (1-phenylcyclohexyl) ethyla- 34 mine, N-(1-phenylcyclohexyl) ethylamine cyclohexamine, PCE. 35 [(22)] (17) Pyrrolidine analog of phencyclidine. Some trade or other 36 names 1-(1-phenylcyclohexyl)-pyrrolidine; PCPy, PHP. 37 [(23)] (18) Thiophene analog of phencyclidine. Some trade or other 38 names: 1-{1-(2-thienyl)-cyclohexyl}-piperidine, 2-thienylanalog of 39 phencyclidine, TPCP, TCP. 40 [(24)] (19) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA). 41 [(25)] (20) 3,4-methylendioxy-N-ethylamphetamine (also known as 42 N-ethyl-alpha-methyl-3,4 (methylenedioxy) phenethylamine, N-ethyl MDA, 43 MDE, MDEA. 44 [(26)] (21) N-hydroxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine (also known as 45 N-hydroxy-alpha-methyl-3,4 (methylenedioxy) phenethylamine, and 46 N-hydroxy MDA. 47 [(27)] (22) 1-{1- (2-thienyl) cyclohexyl} pyrrolidine. Some other 48 names: TCPY. 49 [(28)] (23) Alpha-ethyltryptamine. Some trade or other names: 50 etryptamine; Monase; Alpha-ethyl-1H-indole-3-ethanamine; 51 3- (2-aminobutyl) indole; Alpha-ET or AET. 52 [(29)] (24) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylamphetamine. Some trade or other 53 names: DOET. 54 [(30)] (25) 4-Bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine. Some trade or other 55 names: 2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-1-aminoethane; alpha-desmethyl 56 DOB; 2C-B, Nexus. A. 628 6 1 [(31)] (26) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylthiophenethylamine (2C-T-7), its 2 optical isomers, salts and salts of isomers. 3 [(33)] (27) 2-(4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl) 4 ethanamine also known as 25I-NBOMe; 2C-I-NBOMe; 25I; or Cimbi-5. 5 [(34)] (28) 2-(4-chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl) 6 ethanamine, also known as 25 CNBOMe; 2C-C-NBOMe; 25C; or Cimbi-82. 7 [(35)] (29) 2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl) etha- 8 namine, also known as, 25 BNBOMe; 2C-B-NBOMe; Cimbi-36. 9 [(36)] (30) 5-methoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine. 10 [(37)] (31) Alpha-methyltryptamine. Some trade or other names: AMT. 11 [(38)] (32) 5-methoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine. Some trade or other 12 names: 5-MeO-DIPT. 13 § 4. Paragraphs d and e of subdivision 2 of section 201-d of the labor 14 law, as amended by chapter 354 of the laws of 2023, are amended and a 15 new paragraph f is added to read as follows: 16 d. an individual's membership in a union or any exercise of rights 17 granted under Title 29, USCA, Chapter 7 or under article fourteen of the 18 civil service law; [or] 19 e. an individual's refusal to: (i) attend an employer-sponsored meet- 20 ing with the employer or its agent, representative or designee, the 21 primary purpose of which is to communicate the employer's opinion 22 concerning religious or political matters; or (ii) listen to speech or 23 view communications, the primary purpose of which is to communicate the 24 employer's opinion concerning religious or political matters[.]; or 25 f. an individual's legal recreational activities, including natural 26 plant or fungus-based hallucinogens, as such term is defined by section 27 223.00 of the penal law, in accordance with state law, outside work 28 hours, off of the employer's premises and without use of the employer's 29 equipment or other property. 30 § 5. Section 114-a of the vehicle and traffic law, as amended by chap- 31 ter 92 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 32 § 114-a. Drug. The term "drug" when used in this chapter, means and 33 includes any substance listed in section thirty-three hundred six of the 34 public health law [and], cannabis and concentrated cannabis as defined 35 in section 222.00 of the penal law, and natural plant or fungus-based 36 hallucinogens as defined in section 223.00 of the penal law. 37 § 6. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 38 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment 39 and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation 40 of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 41 completed on or before such effective date.